Washington statutes.
RCW 18.53.210

Inactive license status.

The optometry board may adopt rules under this section authorizing an inactive license status.

(1) An individual licensed under this chapter may place his or her license on inactive status. The holder of an inactive license must not practice optometry in this state without first activating the license.

(2) The inactive renewal fee must be established by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250. Failure to renew an inactive license shall result in cancellation of the inactive license in the same manner as an active license.

(3) An inactive license may be placed in an active status upon compliance with rules established by the optometry board.

(4) Provisions relating to disciplinary action against a person with a license are applicable to a person with an inactive license, except that when disciplinary proceedings against a person with an inactive license have been initiated, the license will remain inactive until the proceedings have been completed.

[ 2006 c 232 s 2.]